it: Direzione di carico del portabottiglie: Doppio accesso; Carica laterale reversibile; Carica laterale (sinistra); Carica laterale (destra); Carica dall’alto/frontale; Universale; Altro
zh-CN: 水壶架取放方向: 双向取放; 可翻转侧向取放; 侧向取放（左侧）; 侧向取放（右侧）; 顶部/前向取放; 通用式; 其他
sv: Flaskhållarens lastriktning: Dubbel åtkomst; Vändbar sidomatning; Sidomatning (vänster); Sidomatning (höger); Topp-/frontmatning; Universell; Annan
th: ทิศทางการบรรจุขวดด้วยที่ยึดขวด: เข้าได้สองทาง; ใส่ด้านข้างแบบสลับฝั่งได้; ใส่ด้านข้าง (ซ้าย); ใส่ด้านข้าง (ขวา); ใส่ด้านบน/ด้านหน้า; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
el: Κατεύθυνση τοποθέτησης παγουροθήκης: Διπλή πρόσβαση; Αναστρέψιμη πλευρική φόρτωση; Πλευρική φόρτωση (αριστερά); Πλευρική φόρτωση (δεξιά); Φόρτωση από επάνω/μπροστά; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
sk-SK: Smer vkladania držiaka na fľaše: Obojstranný prístup; Obojstranné bočné vkladanie; Bočné vkladanie (zľava); Bočné vkladanie (sprava); Vkladanie zhora/spredu; Univerzálne; Iné
tr: Şişe kafesi yükleme yönü: Çift taraflı erişim; Çift yönlü yandan yüklemeli; Yandan yüklemeli (sol); Yandan yüklemeli (sağ); Üstten/önden yüklemeli; Evrensel; Diğer
ja: ボトルケージの積み込み方向: デュアルアクセス; リバーシブルサイドロード; サイドロード（左）; サイドロード（右）; トップ/フロントロード; ユニバーサル; その他
ko: 물통 케이지 장착 방향: 양방향; 양방향 측면 장착; 측면 장착(왼쪽); 측면 장착(오른쪽); 상단/전면 장착; 범용; 기타
ru: Направление загрузки флягодержателя: Двусторонний доступ; Двусторонняя боковая загрузка; Боковая загрузка (слева); Боковая загрузка (справа); Верхняя/фронтальная загрузка; Универсальная; Другое
en: Bottle cage loading direction: Dual access; Reversible side load; Side load (left); Side load (right); Top/front load; Universal; Other
vi: Hướng lắp đặt giá đỡ chai: Hai chiều; Lắp hai bên; Lắp bên trái; Lắp bên phải; Lắp phía trên/trước; Đa năng; Khác
fr: Sens d’insertion dans le porte-bidon: Double accès; Chargement latéral réversible; Chargement latéral (gauche); Chargement latéral (droite); Chargement par le haut/l'avant; Universel; Autre
es: Dirección de carga del portabotellas: Acceso doble; Carga lateral reversible; Carga lateral (izquierda); Carga lateral (derecha); Carga superior/frontal; Universal; Otro
pt-PT: Direção de carregamento do suporte para garrafas: Acesso duplo; Carga lateral reversível; Carga lateral (esquerda); Carga lateral (direita); Carga superior/frontal; Universal; Outro
fi: Pullotelineen lastaussuunta: Kaksisuuntainen; Käännettävä sivulataus; Sivulataus (vasen); Sivulataus (oikea); Ylä-/etulataus; Universaali; Muu
hr-HR: Smjer utovara držača za boce: Dvostruki pristup; Dvostrano bočno umetanje; Bočno umetanje (lijevo); Bočno umetanje (desno); Umetanje odozgo/sprijeda; Univerzalno; Ostalo
da: Flaskeholderens læsseretning: Dobbelt adgang; Vendbar sideadgang; Sideadgang (venstre); Sideadgang (højre); Top-/frontadgang; Universal; Andet
de: Beladungsrichtung des Flaschenhalters: Beidseitiger Zugriff; Reversibler seitlicher Zugriff; Seitlicher Zugriff (links); Seitlicher Zugriff (rechts); Zugriff von oben/vorn; Universal; Sonstige
hu: Kulacstartó betöltési iránya: Kétirányú; Megfordítható oldalsó; Oldalsó (bal); Oldalsó (jobb); Felső/elülső; Univerzális; Egyéb
ro-RO: Direcția de încărcare a suportului pentru sticle: Acces dublu; Încărcare laterală reversibilă; Încărcare laterală (stânga); Încărcare laterală (dreapta); Încărcare superioară/frontală; Universal; Altele
pt-BR: Direção de carregamento do suporte para garrafas: Acesso duplo; Carga lateral reversível; Carga lateral (esquerda); Carga lateral (direita); Carga superior/frontal; Universal; Outros
bg-BG: Посока на зареждане/поставяне на бутилката в стойката за бутилка: Двоен достъп; Обръщаемо странично зареждане; Странично зареждане (ляво); Странично зареждане (дясно); Горно/предно зареждане; Универсална; Друго
sl-SI: Smer vstavljanja bidona v držalo: Dvojni dostop; Obojestranski stranski dostop; Stranski dostop (levo); Stranski dostop (desno); Zgornji/sprednji dostop; Univerzalno; Drugo
cs: Směr vkládání lahve do košíku: Dvojitý přístup; Oboustranné boční vkládání; Boční vkládání (zleva); Boční vkládání (zprava); Horní/přední vkládání; Univerzální; Jiné
zh-TW: 水壺架裝載方向: 雙向抽取; 雙向側抽; 側抽 (左側); 側抽 (右側); 頂部/正面抽取; 通用; 其他
nb: Lasteretning for flaskeholder: Dobbel tilgang; Vendbar sidetilgang; Sidetilgang (venstre); Sidetilgang (høyre); Topp-/fronttilgang; Universell; Annet
nl: Fleshouder laadrichting: Dubbele toegang; Omkeerbaar zijladen; Zijladen (links); Zijladen (rechts); Boven-/voorladen; Universeel; Overige
pl: Kierunek wkładania bidonu do koszyka: Dostęp z dwóch stron; Odwracalne wyciąganie z boku; Z boku (lewa strona); Z boku (prawa strona); Od góry / od przodu; Uniwersalne; Inne
lt-LT: Butelio laikiklio įdėjimo kryptis: Dviguba prieiga; Apverčiamas šoninis įdėjimas; Šoninis įdėjimas (iš kairės); Šoninis įdėjimas (iš dešinės); Įdėjimas iš viršaus / priekio; Universalus; Kita